North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 2. Local Administration.
§ 130A-35.
County board of health; appointment; terms.

A county board of health shall be the policy-making, rule-making and adjudicatory body for a county health department.

The members of a county board of health shall be appointed by the county board of commissioners. The board shall be composed of 11 members. The composition of the board shall reasonably reflect the population makeup of the county and shall include: one
physician licensed to practice medicine in this State, one licensed dentist, one licensed optometrist, one licensed veterinarian, one registered nurse, one licensed pharmacist, one county commissioner, one professional engineer,
and three representatives of the general public. Except as otherwise provided in this section, all members shall be residents of the county. If there is not a licensed physician, a licensed dentist, a licensed veterinarian, a registered
nurse, a licensed pharmacist, or a professional engineer available for appointment, an additional representative of the general public shall be appointed. If however, one of the designated professions has only one person residing
in the county, the county commissioners shall have the option of appointing that person or a member of the general public. In the event a licensed optometrist who is a resident of the county is not available for appointment, then
the county commissioners shall have the option of appointing either a licensed optometrist who is a resident of another county or a member of the general public.

Except as provided in this subsection, members of a county board of health shall serve three-year terms. No member may serve more than three consecutive three-year terms unless the member is the only person residing in the county who represents one of
the professions designated in subsection (b) of this section. The county commissioner member shall serve only as long as the member is a county commissioner. When a representative of the general public is appointed due to the unavailability
of a licensed physician, a licensed dentist, a resident licensed optometrist or a nonresident licensed optometrist as authorized by subsection (b) of this section, a licensed veterinarian, a registered nurse, a licensed pharmacist,
or a professional engineer, that member shall serve only until a licensed physician, a licensed dentist, a licensed resident or nonresident optometrist, a licensed veterinarian, a registered nurse, a licensed pharmacist, or a professional
engineer becomes available for appointment. In order to establish a uniform staggered term structure for the board, a member may be appointed for less than a three-year term.

Vacancies shall be filled for any unexpired portion of a term.

A chairperson shall be elected annually by a county board of health. The local health director shall serve as secretary to the board.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.

A member may be removed from office by the county board of commissioners for:

Commission of a felony or other crime involving moral turpitude;

Violation of a State law governing conflict of interest;

Violation of a written policy adopted by the county board of commissioners;

Habitual failure to attend meetings;

Conduct that tends to bring the office into disrepute; or

Failure to maintain qualifications for appointment required under subsection (b) of this section.A board member may be removed only after the member has been given written notice of the basis for removal and has had the opportunity to respond.

A member may receive a per diem in an amount established by the county board of commissioners. Reimbursement for subsistence and travel shall be in accordance with a policy set by the county board of commissioners.

The board shall meet at least quarterly. The chairperson or three of the members may call a special meeting.

History.
1901, c. 245, s. 3; Rev., s. 4444; 1911, c. 62, s. 9; C.S., s. 7604; 1931, c. 149; 1941, c. 185; 1945, c. 99; c. 1030, s. 2; 1947, c. 474, s. 3; 1951, c. 92; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1963, c. 359; 1967, c. 1224, s. 1; 1969,
c. 719, s. 1; 1971, c. 175, s. 1; c. 940, s. 1; 1973, c. 137, s. 1; c. 1151; 1975, c. 272; 1979, c. 621; 1981, c. 104; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 418, s. 1; 1987, c. 84, s. 1; 1989, c. 764, s. 2; 1995, c. 264, s. 1; 2009-447, s.
1.

Local Modification to Former G.S. 130-13 and Former Similar Provisions.

Caldwell: 1939, c. 366; Cumberland: 1935, c. 159; 1943, c. 91; Edgecombe: 1969, c. 422; Moore: 1943, c. 326, s. 2; Nash: 1949, c. 6, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-447, s. 1, effective August 7, 2009, in subsection (b), substituted “Except as otherwise provided in this section, all members” for “All members,” deleted “a licensed optometrist” following “a licensed dentist,” and added the last sentence;
and in subsection (c), inserted “resident,” “or a nonresident licensed optometrist as authorized by subsection (b) of this section,” and “resident or nonresident.”

§ 130A-36.
Creation of district health department.

A district health department including more than one county may be formed in lieu of county health departments upon agreement of the county boards of commissioners and local boards of health having jurisdiction over each of the counties involved. A county
may join a district health department upon agreement of the boards of commissioners and local boards of health having jurisdiction over each of the counties involved. A district health department shall be a public authority as
defined in G.S. 159-7(b)(10).

Upon creation of or addition to a district health department, the existing rules of the former board or boards of health shall continue in effect until amended or repealed by the district board of health.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 719, s. 2; 1971, c. 175, s. 2; 1973, c. 143, ss. 1-4; c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 396, s. 1; 1981, c. 238; c. 408; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The Pasquotank-Perquimans-Camden-Chowan District Health Department has the authority to operate public transit on a fare paying basis, without establishment of a Transportation Authority. Section 62-260 (a)(1) specifically exempts political subdivisions
of this State from regulation by the North Carolina Utilities Commission. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. David D. King, Director of Division of Public Transportation, North Carolina Department of Transportation, 55 N.C. Op.
Att'y Gen. 76 (1986).

§ 130A-37.
District board of health.

A district board of health shall be the policy-making, rule-making and adjudicatory body for a district health department and shall be composed of 15 members; provided, a district board of health may be increased up to a maximum number of 18 members by
agreement of the boards of county commissioners in all counties that comprise the district. The agreement shall be evidenced by concurrent resolutions adopted by the affected boards of county commissioners.

The county board of commissioners of each county in the district shall appoint one county commissioner to the district board of health. The county commissioner members of the district board of health shall appoint the other members of the board, including
at least one physician licensed to practice medicine in this State, one licensed dentist, one licensed optometrist, one licensed veterinarian, one registered nurse, one licensed pharmacist, and one professional engineer. The composition
of the board shall reasonably reflect the population makeup of the entire district and provide equitable district-wide representation. All members shall be residents of the district. If there is not a licensed physician, a licensed
dentist, a licensed optometrist, a licensed veterinarian, a registered nurse, a licensed pharmacist, or a professional engineer available for appointment, an additional representative of the general public shall be appointed. If
however, one of the designated professions has only one person residing in the district, the county commissioner members shall have the option of appointing that person or a member of the general public.

Except as provided in this subsection, members of a district board of health shall serve terms of three years. Two of the original members shall serve terms of one year and two of the original members shall serve terms of two years. No member shall serve
more than three consecutive three-year terms unless the member is the only person residing in the district who represents one of the professions designated in subsection (b) of this section. County commissioner members shall serve
only as long as the member is a county commissioner. When a representative of the general public is appointed due to the unavailability of a licensed physician, a licensed dentist, a licensed optometrist, a licensed veterinarian,
a registered nurse, a licensed pharmacist, or a professional engineer that member shall serve only until a licensed physician, a licensed dentist, a licensed optometrist, a licensed veterinarian, a registered nurse, a licensed
pharmacist, or a professional engineer becomes available for appointment. The county commissioner members may appoint a member for less than a three-year term to achieve a staggered term structure.

Whenever a county shall join or withdraw from an existing district health department, the district board of health shall be dissolved and a new board shall be appointed as provided in subsection (c).

Vacancies shall be filled for any unexpired portion of a term.

A chairperson shall be elected annually by a district board of health. The local health director shall serve as secretary to the board.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.

A member may be removed from office by the district board of health for:

Commission of a felony or other crime involving moral turpitude;

Violation of a State law governing conflict of interest;

Violation of a written policy adopted by the county board of commissioners of each county in the district;

Habitual failure to attend meetings;

Conduct that tends to bring the office into disrepute; or

Failure to maintain qualifications for appointment required under subsection (b) of this section.A board member may be removed only after the member has been given written notice of the basis for removal and has had the opportunity to respond.

A member may receive a per diem in an amount established by the county commissioner members of the district board of health. Reimbursement for subsistence and travel shall be in accordance with a policy set by the county commissioner members of the district
board of health.

The board shall meet at least quarterly. The chairperson or three of the members may call a special meeting.

A district board of health is authorized to provide liability insurance for the members of the board and the employees of the district health department. A district board of health is also authorized to contract for the services of an attorney to represent
the board, the district health department and its employees, as appropriate. The purchase of liability insurance pursuant to this subsection waives both the district board of health’s and the district health department’s governmental
immunity, to the extent of insurance coverage, for any act or omission occurring in the exercise of a governmental function. By entering into a liability insurance contract with the district board of health, an insurer waives any
defense based upon the governmental immunity of the district board of health or the district health department.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 719, s. 2; 1971, c. 175, s. 2; c. 940, s. 1; 1973, c. 143, ss. 1-4; c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 396, s. 1; 1981, cc. 104, 238, 408; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1077; 1985, c.
418, s. 2; 1987, c. 84, s. 2; 1989, c. 764, s. 3; 1995, c. 264, s. 2.

§ 130A-38.
Dissolution of a district health department.

Whenever the board of commissioners of each county constituting a district health department determines that the district health department is not operating in the best health interests of the respective counties, they may direct that the district health
department be dissolved. In addition, whenever a board of commissioners of a county which is a member of a district health department determines that the district health department is not operating in the best health interests
of that county, it may withdraw from the district health department. Dissolution of a district health department or withdrawal from the district health department by a county shall be effective only at the end of the fiscal year
in which the action of dissolution or withdrawal transpired.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), no district health department shall be dissolved without prior written notification to the Department.

Any budgetary surplus available to a district health department at the time of its dissolution shall be distributed to those counties comprising the district on the same pro rata basis that the counties appropriated and contributed funds to the district
health department budget during the current fiscal year. Distribution to the counties shall be determined on the basis of an audit of the financial record of the district health department. The district board of health shall select
a certified public accountant or an accountant who is subsequently certified by the Local Government Commission to conduct the audit. The audit shall be performed in accordance with

G.S. 159-34

. The same method of distribution of funds described above shall apply when one or more counties of a district health department withdraw from a district.

Upon dissolution or withdrawal, all rules adopted by a district board of health shall continue in effect until amended or repealed by the new board or boards of health.

History.
1971, c. 858; 1975, c. 396, s. 2; c. 403; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-39.
Powers and duties of a local board of health.

A local board of health shall have the responsibility to protect and promote the public health. The board shall have the authority to adopt rules necessary for that purpose.

A local board of health may adopt a more stringent rule in an area regulated by the Commission for Public Health or the Environmental Management Commission where, in the opinion of the local board of health, a more stringent rule is required to protect
the public health; otherwise, the rules of the Commission for Public Health or the rules of the Environmental Management Commission shall prevail over local board of health rules. However, a local board of health may not adopt
a rule concerning the grading, operating, and permitting of food and lodging facilities as listed in Part 6 of Article 8 of this Chapter and as defined in G.S. 130A-247(1), and a local board of health may adopt rules concerning
wastewater collection, treatment and disposal systems which are not designed to discharge effluent to the land surface or surface waters only in accordance with

G.S. 130A-335(c)

.

The rules of a local board of health shall apply to all municipalities within the local board’s jurisdiction.

Not less than 10 days before the adoption, amendment or repeal of any local board of health rule, the proposed rule shall be made available at the office of each county clerk within the board’s jurisdiction, and a notice shall be published in a newspaper
having general circulation within the area of the board’s jurisdiction. The notice shall contain a statement of the substance of the proposed rule or a description of the subjects and issues involved, the proposed effective date
of the rule and a statement that copies of the proposed rule are available at the local health department. A local board of health rule shall become effective upon adoption unless a later effective date is specified in the rule.

Copies of all rules shall be filed with the secretary of the local board of health.

A local board of health may, in its rules, adopt by reference any code, standard, rule or regulation which has been adopted by any agency of this State, another state, any agency of the United States or by a generally recognized association. Copies of
any material adopted by reference shall be filed with the rules.

A local board of health may impose a fee for services to be rendered by a local health department, except where the imposition of a fee is prohibited by statute or where an employee of the local health department is performing the services as an agent
of the State. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a local board of health may impose cost-related fees for services performed pursuant to Article 11 of this Chapter, “Wastewater Systems,” for services performed pursuant
to Part 10, Article 8 of this Chapter, “Public Swimming Pools”, for services performed pursuant to Part 11, Article 8 of this Chapter, “Tattooing”, and for services performed pursuant to

G.S. 87-97

. Fees shall be based upon a plan recommended by the local health director and approved by the local board of health and the appropriate county board or boards of commissioners. The fees collected under the authority
of this subsection are to be deposited to the account of the local health department so that they may be expended for public health purposes in accordance with the provisions of the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act.

History.
1901, c. 245, s. 3; Rev., s. 4444; 1911, c. 62, s. 9; C.S., s. 7065; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1959, c. 1024, s. 1; 1963, c. 1087; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; c. 508; 1977, c. 857, s. 2; 1981, c. 130, s. 2; c. 281; c. 949, s. 4; 1983,
c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 175, s. 1; 1989, c. 577, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 944, s. 10; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 670, s. 2; 1995, c. 507, s. 26.8(c); 2006-202, s. 6; 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-202, s. 6, effective August 7, 2006, added “and for services performed pursuant to

G.S. 87-97

” and made a minor stylistic change at the end of the second sentence of subsection (g).

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” twice in subsection (b).

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Preemption Hogwash: North Carolina’s Judicial Repeal of Local Authority to Regulate Hog Farms in Craig v. County of Chatham,” see 80 N.C.L. Rev. 2121 (2002).

§ 130A-40.
Appointment of local health director.

A local board of health, after consulting with the appropriate county board or boards of commissioners, shall appoint a local health director. All persons who are appointed to the position of local health director on or after January 1, 1992, must possess
minimum education and experience requirements for that position, as follows:

A medical doctorate; or

A masters degree in Public Health Administration, and at least one year of employment experience in health programs or health services; or

A masters degree in a public health discipline other than public health administration, and at least three years of employment experience in health programs or health services; or

A masters degree in public administration, and at least two years of experience in health programs or health services; or

A masters degree in a field related to public health, and at least three years of experience in health programs or health services; or

A bachelors degree in public health administration or public administration and at least three years of experience in health programs or health services.

Before appointing a person to the position of local health director under subsection (a)(5) of this section, the local board of health shall forward the application and other pertinent materials of such candidate to the State Health Director. If the State
Health Director determines that the candidate’s masters degree is in a field not related to public health, the State Health Director shall so notify the local board of health in writing within 15 days of the State Health Director’s
receipt of the application and materials, and such candidate shall be deemed not to meet the education requirements of subsection (a)(5) of this section. If the State Health Director fails to act upon the application within 15
days of receipt of the application and materials from the local board of health, the application shall be deemed approved with respect to the education requirements of subsection (a)(5) of this section, and the local board of health
may proceed with appointment process.

The State Health Director shall review requests of educational institutions to determine whether a particular masters degree offered by the requesting institution is related to public health for the purposes of subsection (a)(5) of this section. The State
Health Director shall act upon such requests within 90 days of receipt of the request and pertinent materials from the institution, and shall notify the institution of its determination in writing within the 90-day review period.
If the State Health Director determines that an institution’s particular masters degree is not related to public health, the State Health Director shall include the reasons therefor in his written determination to the institution.

When a local board of health fails to appoint a local health director within 60 days of the creation of a vacancy, the State Health Director may appoint a local health director to serve until the local board of health appoints a local health director
in accordance with this section.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 152; c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 75; 1991, c. 612, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Employment and termination of local health director
are subject to the provisions of Chapter 126, the State Personnel Act [now North Carolina Human Resources Act], and termination or discharge of a health director must comply with all statutory provisions and regulations
duly adopted by the State Personnel Commission [now State Human Resources Commission] pursuant to Chapter 126. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Michael S. Kennedy, Esquire, Attorney for Cleveland County Board of Health, and Mr.
Robert W. Yelton, Esquire, Attorney for Cleveland County, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 113 (1986).

The discharge of a local health director must comply with Chapter 126. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Robert W. Yelton, Attorney for Cleveland County Board of Health, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 113 (1986).

§ 130A-40.1.
Pilot program for nurse as health director.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 130A-40

, a local board of health, after consulting with the appropriate county board of commissioners, and with the approval of the Secretary of Health and Human Services, may appoint a local health director who meets the
following education and experience requirements for that position:

Graduation from a four-year college or university with a Bachelor of Science in Nursing degree that includes a public health nursing rotation; or

A candidate with an RN but not a bachelors degree if the candidate has at least 10 years’ experience, at least seven years of which must be in an administrative or supervisory role, and of this seven years, at least five years must be at the agency at
which the candidate is an applicant for employment as local health director.

The Secretary of Health and Human Services may approve only one request under subsection (a) of this section, this section being designed as a pilot program concerning alternative qualifications for a local health director. The Secretary of Health and
Human Services shall report any approval under this section to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services.

All bachelors level candidates appointed under this section shall have a total of 10 years’ public health experience, at least five years of which must be in a supervisory capacity at the agency at which the candidate is an applicant for employment as
a local health director. Bachelor of Science in Nursing candidates with a public health rotation may use this BSN degree as credit for one year’s public health experience.

In addition to possessing the qualifications required in this section, all Bachelor of Science, Bachelor of Arts, or Registered Nurse candidates must complete at least six contact hours of continuing education annually on the subject of local and State
government finance, organization, or budgeting. The training must be in a formal setting offered through the State or local government or through an accredited educational institution. This training is in addition to any other
required training for local health director or other continuing education required to maintain other professional credentials. If during the course of employment as local health director the employee meets the requirements of this
subsection, the additional training requirements of this section are waived.

History.
2003-284, s. 10.33C; 2011-266, s. 1.16(b); 2011-291, s. 2.46; 2012-194, s. 27.

§ 130A-41.
Powers and duties of local health director.

A local health director shall be the administrative head of the local health department, shall perform public health duties prescribed by and under the supervision of the local board of health and the Department and shall be employed full time in the
field of public health.

A local health director shall have the following powers and duties:

To administer programs as directed by the local board of health;

To enforce the rules of the local board of health;

To investigate the causes of infectious, communicable and other diseases;

To exercise quarantine authority and isolation authority pursuant to

G.S. 130A-145

;

To disseminate public health information and to promote the benefits of good health;

To advise local officials concerning public health matters;

To enforce the immunization requirements of Part 2 of Article 6 of this Chapter;

To examine and investigate cases of venereal disease pursuant to Parts 3 and 4 of Article 6 of this Chapter;

To examine and investigate cases of tuberculosis pursuant to Part 5 of Article 6 of this Chapter;

To examine, investigate and control rabies pursuant to Part 6 of Article 6 of this Chapter;

To abate public health nuisances and imminent hazards pursuant to

G.S. 130A-19

and

G.S. 130A-20

;

To employ and dismiss employees of the local health department in accordance with Chapter 126 of the General Statutes; [and]

To enter contracts, in accordance with The Local Government Finance Act, G.S. Chapter 159, on behalf of the local health department. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to abrogate the authority of the board of county commissioners.

Authority conferred upon a local health director may be exercised only within the county or counties comprising the local health department.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 175, s. 2; 1999-110, s. 1.

§ 130A-42.
Personnel records of district health departments.

Employee personnel records of a district health department shall have the same protections from disclosure as county employee personnel records under

G.S. 153A-98

. For the purposes of this section, the local health director shall perform the duties assigned to the county manager pursuant to

G.S. 153A-98

and the district board of health shall perform the duties assigned to the county board of commissioners pursuant to G.S. 153A-98.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

Part 1A. Consolidated Human Services Agency.

§ 130A-43.
Consolidated human services agency; board; director.

Except as otherwise provided by this section and subject to any limitations that may be imposed by the board of county commissioners under

G.S. 153A-77

, a consolidated human services agency created pursuant to

G.S. 153A-77

shall have the responsibility to carry out the duties of a local health department and the authority to administer the local public health programs established in this Chapter in the same manner as a local health
department.

In addition to the powers conferred by

G.S. 153A-77(d)

, a consolidated human services board shall have all the powers and duties of a local board of health as provided by

G.S. 130A-39

, except that the consolidated human services board may not:

Appoint the human services director.

Transmit or present the budget for local health programs.

In addition to the powers conferred by

G.S. 153A-77(e)

, a human services director shall have all the powers and duties of a local health director provided by

G.S. 130A-41

, except that the human services director may:

Serve as the executive officer of the consolidated human services agency only to the extent and in the manner authorized by the county manager.

Appoint staff of the consolidated human services agency only upon the approval of the county manager.

History.
1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 690, s. 14.

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 469 (1998).

§ 130A-44.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 1B. Public Health Authorities Authorized.

§ 130A-45.
Title and purpose.

This Part shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Health Authorities Act”.

The purpose of this Part is to provide an alternative method for counties to provide public health services. This Part shall not be regarded as repealing any powers now existing under any other law, either general, special, or local.

It is the policy of the General Assembly that Public Health Authorities should have adequate authority to exercise the powers, rights, duties, functions, privileges, and immunities conferred upon them by law.

History.
1997-502, s. 1.

§ 130A-45.01.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, unless otherwise specified:

“Authority service area” means the area within the boundaries of the authority as provided for in

G.S. 130A-45.4

.

“Board” means a public health authority board created under this Part.

“County” means the county which is, or is about to be, included in the territorial boundaries of a public health authority when created hereunder.

“County board of commissioners” means the legislative body charged with governing the county.

“Department” means the Department of Health and Human Services.

“Federal government” means the United States of America, or any agency, instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Government” means the State and federal governments and any subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them.

“Public health authority” means a public body and a body corporate and politic organized under the provisions of this Part.

“Public health facility” means any one or more buildings, structures, additions, extensions, improvements, or other facilities, whether or not located on the same site or sites, machinery, equipment, furnishings or other real or personal property suitable
for providing public health services; and includes, without limitation, local public health departments or centers; public health clinics and outpatient facilities; nursing homes, including skilled nursing facilities and intermediate
care facilities, adult care homes for the aged and disabled; public health laboratories; administration buildings, central service and other administrative facilities; communication, computer and other electronic facilities; pharmaceutical
facilities; storage space; vehicular parking lots and other such public health facilities, customarily under the jurisdiction of or provided by public health departments, or any combination of the foregoing, with all necessary,
convenient or related interests in land, machinery, apparatus, appliances, equipment, furnishings, appurtenances, site preparation, landscaping, and physical amenities.

“Real property” means lands, lands under water, structures, and any and all easements, franchises and incorporeal hereditaments and every estate and right therein, legal and equitable, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage or
otherwise.

“State” means the State of North Carolina.

History.
1997-502, s. 1.

§ 130A-45.02.
Creation of a public health authority.

A public health authority may be created upon joint resolution of the county board of commissioners and the local board of health that it is in the interest of the public health and welfare to create a public health authority to provide public health
services as required under

G.S. 130A-34

.

A public health authority including more than one county may be formed upon joint resolution of the county boards of commissioners and local boards of health having jurisdiction over each of the counties involved.

After the adoption of a resolution creating a public health authority, a public health authority board shall be appointed in accordance with

G.S. 130A-45.1

.

A county may join a public health authority upon joint resolution of the boards of commissioners and local boards of health having jurisdiction over each of the counties involved.

A public health authority board shall govern the public health authority. All powers, duties, functions, rights, privileges, or immunities conferred on the public health authority may be exercised by the authority board.

The public health authority board shall absorb the functions, assets, and liabilities of the county or district boards of health, and that board is dissolved.

For the purpose of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, a public health authority is a public authority as defined in G.S. 159-7(b)(10).

Before adopting a resolution creating a public health authority, the county board of commissioners shall hold a public hearing with notice published at least 10 days before the hearing.

For the purposes of Article 9 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, a public health authority is a person as defined in

G.S. 131E-176(19)

.

History.
1997-502, s. 1; 2001-92, s. 3.

§ 130A-45.1.
Membership of the public health authority board.

A public health authority board shall be the policy-making, rule-making, and adjudicatory body for a public health authority and shall be composed of no fewer than seven members and no more than nine members; except that in an authority comprising two
or more counties, the board shall be composed of no more than 11 members. Boards which intend to pursue federally qualified health center (or look-alike) status may have no fewer than nine and no more than 25 members.

In a single county authority, the county board of commissioners shall appoint the members of the board; in an authority comprising two or more counties, the chair of the county board of commissioners of each county in the authority shall appoint one county
commissioner, or the commissioner’s express designee, to the authority board and these members shall jointly appoint the other members of the board.

The members of the board shall include:

At least one physician licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes to practice medicine in this State, and at least one dentist licensed under Article 2 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes to practice dentistry in this State;

At least one county commissioner or the commissioner’s express designee from each county in the authority;

At least two licensed or registered professionals from any of the following professions: optometry, veterinary science, nursing, pharmacy, engineering, or accounting;

At least one member from the administrative staff of a hospital serving the authority service area; and

At least one member from the general public.

Except as provided in this subsection, members of the board shall serve terms of three years. In order to establish a uniform staggered term structure for the Board, a member may be appointed for less than a three-year term.

Any member who is a county commissioner serves on the board in an ex officio capacity.

Whenever a county shall join or withdraw from an existing public health authority, the board shall be dissolved and a new board shall be appointed as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

Vacancies shall be filled within 120 days for any unexpired portion of a term.

A chair shall be elected annually by a board. The authority director shall serve as secretary to the board.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.

A member may be removed from office by the board for any of the following:

Commission of a felony or other crime involving moral turpitude.

Violation of a State law governing conflict of interest.

Violation of a written policy adopted by the county board of commissioners of each county in the authority.

Habitual failure to attend meetings.

Conduct that tends to bring the office into disrepute.

Failure to maintain qualifications for appointment required under subsection (c) of this section.A board member may be removed only after the member has been given written notice of the basis for removal and has had the opportunity to respond.

Board members may receive per diem in an amount established by the county commissioner members of the Public Health Authority Board. Reimbursement for subsistence and travel shall be in accordance with a policy set by the county commissioner members of
the Public Health Authority Board.

The board shall meet at least quarterly. The chair or three of the members may call a special meeting.

History.
1997-502, s. 1; 2005-459, s. 2; 2007-229, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-459, s. 2, effective October 2, 2005, added the second sentence in subsection (a); and in subsection (d), deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Two of the original members shall serve terms of one year, and two of the original
members shall serve terms of two years.” and added the present second sentence.

Session Laws 2007-229, s. 1, effective July 18, 2007, rewrote subsection (k).

§ 130A-45.2.
Dissolution of a public health authority.

Whenever the board of commissioners of each county constituting a public health authority determines that the authority is not operating in the best health interests of the authority service area, they may direct that the authority be dissolved. In addition,
whenever a board of commissioners of a county which is a member of an authority determines that the authority is not operating in the best health interests of that county, it may withdraw from the authority. Dissolution of an authority
or withdrawal from the authority by a county shall be effective only at the end of the fiscal year in which the action of dissolution or withdrawal transpired.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, no public health authority shall be dissolved without prior written notification to the Department.

Any budgetary surplus available to a public health authority at the time of its dissolution shall be distributed to those counties comprising the authority on the same pro rata basis that the counties appropriated and contributed funds to the authority’s
budget during the current fiscal year. Distribution to the counties shall be determined on the basis of an audit of the financial record of the authority. The public health authority board shall select a certified public accountant
or an accountant who is subsequently certified by the Local Government Commission to conduct the audit. The audit shall be performed in accordance with

G.S. 159-34

. The same method of distribution of funds described above shall apply when one or more counties of an authority withdraw from the authority.

Upon dissolution or withdrawal, all rules adopted by the board continue in effect until amended or repealed by the new authority board or boards of health.

History.
1997-502, s. 1.